Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2602.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-10-12 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-10 entitled "Preliminary
Proceedings in District Courts" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-10-12. Filing of complaints.
(a) Subject to any other provisions of law relative to the filing of complaints for particular
crimes, any judge of the district court or superior court may place on file any complaint in a criminal
case other than a complaint for the commission of a felony or a complaint against a person who has
been convicted of a felony or a private complaint. The court may, in its discretion, determine the
length of time in which the case will be on file but in no event shall it be longer than the maximum
jail sentence allowed by law. The court may in its discretion require, as a condition of the filing,
the performance of services for the public good or may attach any other conditions to it that the
court shall determine; provided, in cases where the court ordered restitution totals less than two
hundred dollars ($200) to an injured party pursuant to this section or § 12-19-34, the court shall
require that full restitution be made at the time of sentencing if the court determines that the
defendant has the present ability to make the restitution.
(b) Express conditions of any filing in accordance with this section shall be that the
defendant at all times during the period of filing keep the peace and be of good behavior and shall
have paid all outstanding court-imposed or court-related fees, fines, costs, assessments, charges,
and/or any other monetary obligations unless reduced or waived by order of the court. A violation

of any condition set by the court may be deemed a violation of the filing and the matter that was
filed may be resurrected by the court, or the court may impose a sanction. A determination of
whether a violation has occurred shall be made by the court in accordance with the procedures
relating to a violation of probation, §§ 12-19-9 and 12-19-14.
(c) In the event the complaint was originally filed under this section subsequent to the
defendant’s plea of guilty or nolo contendere to the charges, the court, if it finds there to have been
a violation but does not impose a sanction, may sentence the defendant. In the event the court filed
the complaint under this section while the defendant maintained a plea of not guilty, if the court
finds there to have been a violation but does not impose a sanction, it may proceed to the further
disposition of the complaint according to law. If no action is taken on the complaint during the
period of filing, the complaint shall be automatically expunged. No criminal record shall result;
provided, that in any civil action for a tort, a plea of guilty or a finding of guilty should be admissible
notwithstanding the fact that the complaint has been filed.
(d) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, in the event a complaint for a
crime involving domestic violence was originally filed under this section subsequent to the
defendant’s plea of guilty or nolo contendere to the charges, the court, if it finds there to have been
a violation, may sentence the defendant. In the event the court filed the complaint for a crime
involving domestic violence under this section while the defendant maintained a plea of not guilty,
if the court finds there to have been a violation, it may proceed to the further disposition of the
complaint for a crime involving domestic violence according to law. If, during the period of filing,
the defendant is not charged with a violation pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, the filed
complaint for the crime involving domestic violence shall be automatically quashed and shall not
be resurrected. If, for a period of three (3) years after the date of filing, the defendant is not charged
with a crime involving domestic violence, or if so charged, is acquitted or the complaint is
dismissed, all records relating to the filed complaint for a crime involving domestic violence shall
be expunged without the requirement of filing a motion pursuant to chapter 1.3 of title 12. No
criminal records shall result, unless in any civil action for a tort, in which a plea of guilty or a
finding of guilty is admissible notwithstanding the fact that the complaint has been filed. Provided,
however, that in sentencing a defendant for a crime involving domestic violence of which the
defendant was charged within three (3) years after the filing of a prior crime involving domestic
violence to which the defendant pleaded guilty or nolo contendere, the court may take the plea into
consideration.
(e) The defendant shall be advised that any and all bail money relating to a case that remains
on deposit and is not claimed at the time of expungement shall be escheated to the state’s general
LC004680 - Page 2 of 4

treasury in accordance with chapter 12 of title 8.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004680
========
LC004680 - Page 3 of 4